Washington statutes.
RCW 11.114.040

Transfer by gift or exercise of power of appointment.

A person may make a transfer by irrevocable gift to, or the irrevocable exercise of a power of appointment in favor of, a custodian for the benefit of a minor pursuant to RCW 11.114.090.

[ 1991 c 193 s 4.]